New Jersey, session 222, S346.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 26 of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-26) is amended to read as follows: 26. a.  Moneys appropriated from the Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund to the Department of Environmental Protection shall be used by the department to: (1)  Pay the cost of acquisition and development of lands by the State for recreation and conservation purposes; (2)  Provide grants and loans to assist local government units to pay the cost of acquisition and development of lands for recreation and conservation purposes; and (3)  Provide grants to assist qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organizations to pay the cost of acquisition and development of lands for recreation and conservation purposes. b.    The expenditure and allocation of constitutionally dedicated moneys for recreation and conservation purposes shall reflect the geographic diversity of the State to the maximum extent practicable and feasible. c. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 5 of P.L.1985, c.310 (C.13:18A-34) or this act, or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto, to the contrary, the value of a pinelands development credit, allocated to a parcel pursuant to P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.) and the pinelands comprehensive management plan adopted pursuant thereto, shall be made utilizing a value to be determined by either appraisal, regional averaging based upon appraisal data, or a formula supported by appraisal data.  The appraisal and appraisal data shall consider as appropriate:  land values in the pinelands regional growth areas; land values in counties, municipalities, and other areas reasonably contiguous to, but outside of, the pinelands area; and other relevant factors as may be necessary to maintain the environmental, ecological, and agricultural qualities of the pinelands area. (2)  No pinelands development credit allocated to a parcel of land pursuant to P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.) and the pinelands comprehensive management plan adopted pursuant thereto that is acquired or obtained in connection with the acquisition of the parcel for recreation and conservation purposes by the State, a local government unit, or a qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization using constitutionally dedicated moneys in whole or in part may be conveyed in any manner.  All such pinelands development credits shall be retired permanently. d.    (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2010, c.70) e.    Moneys appropriated from the fund may be used to match grants, contributions, donations, or reimbursements from federal aid programs or from other public or private sources established for the same or similar purposes as the fund. f.     Moneys appropriated from the fund shall not be used by local government units or qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organizations to acquire lands that are already permanently preserved for recreation and conservation purposes, as determined by the department. g.    Whenever lands are donated to the State by a public utility, as defined pursuant to Title 48 of the Revised Statutes, for recreation and conservation purposes, the commissioner may make and keep the lands accessible to the public, unless the commissioner determines that public accessibility would be detrimental to the lands or any natural resources associated therewith. h.    Whenever the State acquires land for recreation and conservation purposes, the agency in the Department of Environmental Protection responsible for administering the land shall, within six months after the date of acquisition, inspect the land for the presence of any buildings or structures thereon which are or may be historic properties and, within 60 days after completion of the inspection, provide to the New Jersey Historic Preservation Office in the department (1) a written notice of its findings, and (2) for any buildings or structures which are or may be historic properties discovered on the land, a request for determination of potential eligibility for inclusion of the historic building or structure in the New Jersey Register of Historic Places.  Whenever such a building or structure is discovered, a copy of the written notice provided to the New Jersey Historic Preservation Office shall also be sent to the New Jersey Historic Trust and to the county historical commission or advisory committee, the county historical society, the local historic preservation commission or advisory committee, and the local historical society if any of those entities exist in the county or municipality wherein the land is located. i.     (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2010, c.70) j. (1) Commencing on the date of enactment of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-1 et al.) and through June 30, [2024] 2029 for lands located in the Highlands Region as defined pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-3), when the department, a local government unit, or a qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization seeks to acquire lands for recreation and conservation purposes using constitutionally dedicated moneys in whole or in part, Green Acres bond act moneys in whole or in part, or constitutionally dedicated CBT moneys pursuant to P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-43 et seq.) in whole or in part, it shall conduct or cause to be conducted an appraisal or appraisals of the value of the lands that shall be made using (a) the land use zoning of the lands, and any State environmental laws or Department of Environmental Protection rules and regulations that may affect the value of the lands, subject to the appraisal and in effect at the time of proposed acquisition, and (b) the land use zoning of the lands, and any State environmental laws or Department of Environmental Protection rules and regulations that may affect the value of the lands, subject to the appraisal and in effect on January 1, 2004.  The higher of those two values shall be utilized by the department, a local government unit, or a qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization as the basis for negotiation with the landowner with respect to the acquisition price for the lands.  The landowner shall be provided with both values determined pursuant to this paragraph. A landowner may waive any of the requirements of this paragraph and may agree to sell the lands for less than the values determined pursuant to this paragraph. The provisions of this paragraph shall be applicable only to lands the owner of which at the time of proposed acquisition is the same person who owned the lands on the date of enactment of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-1 et al.) and who has owned the lands continuously since that enactment date, or is an immediate family member of that person. (2)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2010, c.70) (3)  The requirements of this subsection shall be in addition to any other requirements of law, rule, or regulation not inconsistent therewith. (4)  This subsection shall not: (a)   apply in the case of lands to be acquired with federal moneys in whole or in part; (b)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2010, c.70); or (c)   alter any requirements to disclose information to a landowner pursuant to the "Eminent Domain Act of 1971," P.L.1971, c.361 (C.20:3-1 et seq.). (5)  For the purposes of this subsection, "immediate family member" means a spouse, child, parent, sibling, aunt, uncle, niece, nephew, first cousin, grandparent, grandchild, father-in-law, mother-in-law, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, stepparent, stepchild, stepbrother, stepsister, half brother, or half sister, whether the individual is related by blood, marriage, or adoption. k.    The department shall adopt guidelines for the evaluation and priority ranking process which shall be used in making decisions concerning the acquisition of lands by the State for recreation and conservation purposes using moneys from the Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund and from any other source.  The guidelines shall be designed to provide, to the maximum extent practicable and feasible, that such moneys are spent equitably among the geographic areas of the State.  The guidelines, and any subsequent revisions thereto, shall be published in the New Jersey Register.  The adoption of the guidelines or of the revisions thereto, shall not be subject to the requirements of the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.). l.     In making decisions concerning the acquisition of lands by the State for recreation and conservation purposes using moneys from the Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund, in the evaluation and priority ranking process the department shall accord three times the weight to acquisitions of lands that would protect water resources, and two times the weight to acquisitions of lands that would protect flood-prone areas, as those criteria are compared to the other criteria in the priority ranking process. m.   The department, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), shall adopt rules and regulations that establish standards and requirements regulating any activity on lands acquired by the State for recreation and conservation purposes using constitutionally dedicated moneys to assure that the activity on those lands does not diminish the protection of surface water or groundwater resources. Any rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this subsection shall not apply to activities on lands acquired prior to the adoption of the rules and regulations. n. (1) The department, within three months after the date of the first meeting of the Highlands Water Protection and Planning Council established pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-4), shall consult with and solicit recommendations from the council concerning land preservation strategies and acquisition plans in the Highlands Region as defined in section 3 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-3). The council's recommendations shall also address strategies and plans concerning establishment by the department of a methodology for prioritizing the acquisition of land in the Highlands preservation area, as defined in section 3 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-3), for recreation and conservation purposes using moneys from the Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund, especially with respect to (a) any land that has declined substantially in value due to the implementation of the "Highlands Water Protection and Planning Act," P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-1 et al.), and (b) any major Highlands development, as defined in section 3 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-3), that would have qualified for an exemption pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection a. of section 30 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-28) but for the lack of a necessary State permit as specified in subparagraph (b) or (c), as appropriate, of paragraph (3) of subsection a. of section 30 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-28), and for which an application for such a permit had been submitted to the Department of Environmental Protection and deemed by the department to be complete for review on or before March 29, 2004.  The recommendations may also include a listing of specific parcels in the Highlands preservation area that the council is aware of that meet the criteria of subparagraph (a) or (b) of this paragraph and for that reason should be considered by the department as a priority for acquisition, but any such list shall remain confidential notwithstanding any provision of P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.) or any other law to the contrary. (2)  In making decisions concerning applications for funding submitted by municipalities in the Highlands planning area, as defined in section 3 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-3), to acquire or develop lands for recreation and conservation purposes using moneys from the Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund, in the evaluation and priority ranking process the department shall accord a higher weight to any application submitted by a municipality in the Highlands planning area that has amended its development regulations in accordance with section 13 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-13) to establish one or more receiving zones for the transfer of development potential from the Highlands preservation area, as defined in section 3 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-3), than that which is accorded to comparable applications submitted by other municipalities in the Highlands planning area that have not made such amendments to their development regulations. o.    Notwithstanding any provision of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-1 et seq.) to the contrary, for State fiscal years 2005 through 2009, the sum spent by the department in each of those fiscal years for the acquisition of lands by the State for recreation and conservation purposes using moneys from the Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund in each county of the State shall be not less, and may be greater if additional sums become available, than the average annual sum spent by the department therefor in each such county, respectively, for State fiscal years 2002 through 2004, provided there is sufficient and appropriate lands within the county to be so acquired by the State for such purposes. (cf:  P.L.2019, c.136, s.8) 2.    Section 38 of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-38) is amended to read as follows: 38. a. All acquisitions or grants made pursuant to section 37 of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-37) shall be made with respect to farmland devoted to farmland preservation under programs established by law. b.    The expenditure and allocation of constitutionally dedicated moneys for farmland preservation purposes shall reflect the geographic diversity of the State to the maximum extent practicable and feasible. c.    The committee shall implement the provisions of section 37 of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-37) in accordance with the procedures and criteria established pursuant to the "Agriculture Retention and Development Act," P.L.1983, c.32 (C.4:1C-11 et seq.) except as provided otherwise by P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-1 et seq.). d.    The committee shall adopt the same or a substantially similar method for determining, for the purposes of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-1 et seq.), the committee's share of the cost of a development easement on farmland to be acquired by a local government as that which is being used by the committee on the date of enactment of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-1 et seq.) for prior farmland preservation funding programs. e.    Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24 of P.L.1983, c.32 (C.4:1C-31) or  P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-1 et seq.), or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto to the contrary, whenever the value of a development easement on farmland to be acquired using constitutionally dedicated moneys in whole or in part is determined based upon the value of any pinelands development credits allocated to the parcel pursuant to P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.) and the pinelands comprehensive management plan adopted pursuant thereto, the committee shall determine the value of the development easement by: (1) conducting a sufficient number of fair market value appraisals as it deems appropriate to determine the value for farmland preservation purposes of the pinelands development credits; (2) considering development easement values in counties, municipalities, and other areas (a) reasonably contiguous to, but outside of, the pinelands area, which in the sole opinion of the committee constitute reasonable development easement values in the pinelands area for the purposes of this subsection, and (b) in the pinelands area where pinelands development credits are or may be utilized, which in the sole opinion of the committee constitute reasonable development easement values in the pinelands area for the purposes of this subsection; (3) considering land values in the pinelands regional growth areas; (4) considering the importance of preserving agricultural lands in the pinelands area; and (5) considering such other relevant factors, including the rate of inflation, as may be necessary to increase participation in the farmland preservation program by owners of agricultural lands located in the pinelands area. f.     No pinelands development credit that is acquired or obtained in connection with the acquisition of a development easement on farmland or fee simple title to farmland by the State, a local government unit, or a qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization using constitutionally dedicated moneys in whole or in part may be conveyed in any manner.  All such pinelands development credits shall be retired permanently. g.    (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2010, c.70) h.    Any farmland for which a development easement or fee simple title has been acquired pursuant to section 37 of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-37) shall be entitled to the benefits conferred by the "Right to Farm Act," P.L.1983, c.31 (C.4:1C-1 et al.) and the "Agriculture Retention and Development Act," P.L.1983, c.32 (C.4:1C-11 et al.). i.     (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2010, c.70) j. (1) Commencing on the date of enactment of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-1 et al.) and through June 30, [2024] 2029 for lands located in the Highlands Region as defined pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-3), when the committee, a local government unit, or a qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization seeks to acquire a development easement on farmland or the fee simple title to farmland for farmland preservation purposes using constitutionally dedicated moneys in whole or in part, Green Acres bond act moneys in whole or in part, or constitutionally dedicated CBT moneys pursuant to P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-43 et seq.) in whole or in part, it shall conduct or cause to be conducted an appraisal or appraisals of the value of the lands that shall be made using (a) the land use zoning of the lands, and any State environmental laws or Department of Environmental Protection rules and regulations that may affect the value of the lands, subject to the appraisal and in effect at the time of proposed acquisition, and (b) the land use zoning of the lands, and any State environmental laws or Department of Environmental Protection rules and regulations that may affect the value of the lands, subject to the appraisal and in effect on January 1, 2004.  The higher of those two values shall be utilized by the committee, a local government unit, or a qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization as the basis for negotiation with the landowner with respect to the acquisition price for the lands.  The landowner shall be provided with both values determined pursuant to this paragraph. A landowner may waive any of the requirements of this paragraph and may agree to sell the lands for less than the values determined pursuant to this paragraph. The provisions of this paragraph shall be applicable only to lands the owner of which at the time of proposed acquisition is the same person who owned the lands on the date of enactment of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-1 et al.) and who has owned the lands continuously since that enactment date, or is an immediate family member of that person. (2) (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2010, c.70) (3) The requirements of this subsection shall be in addition to any other requirements of law, rule, or regulation not inconsistent therewith. (4) This subsection shall not: (a) apply in the case of lands to be acquired with federal moneys in whole or in part; (b) (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2010, c.70); or (c) alter any requirements to disclose information to a landowner pursuant to the "Eminent Domain Act of 1971," P.L.1971, c.361 (C.20:3-1 et seq.). (5) For the purposes of this subsection, "immediate family member" means a spouse, child, parent, sibling, aunt, uncle, niece, nephew, first cousin, grandparent, grandchild, father-in-law, mother-in-law, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, stepparent, stepchild, stepbrother, stepsister, half-brother, or half-sister, whether the individual is related by blood, marriage, or adoption. k.    The committee and the Department of Environmental Protection, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), shall jointly adopt rules and regulations that establish standards and requirements regulating any improvement on lands acquired by the State for farmland preservation purposes using constitutionally dedicated moneys to assure that any improvement does not diminish the protection of surface water or groundwater resources. Any rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this subsection shall not apply to improvements on lands acquired prior to the adoption of the rules and regulations. l. (1) The committee, within three months after the date of the first meeting of the Highlands Water Protection and Planning Council established pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-4), shall consult with and solicit recommendations from the council concerning farmland preservation strategies and acquisition plans in the Highlands Region as defined in section 3 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-3). The council's recommendations shall also address strategies and plans concerning establishment by the committee of a methodology for prioritizing the acquisition of development easements and fee simple titles to farmland in the Highlands preservation area, as defined in section 3 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-3), for farmland preservation purposes using moneys from the Garden State Farmland Preservation Trust Fund, especially with respect to farmland that has declined substantially in value due to the implementation of the "Highlands Water Protection and Planning Act," P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-1 et al.).  The recommendations may also include a listing of specific parcels in the Highlands preservation area that the council is aware of that have experienced a substantial decline in value and for that reason should be considered by the committee as a priority for acquisition, but any such list shall remain confidential notwithstanding any provision of P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.) or any other law to the contrary. (2) In prioritizing applications for funding submitted by local government units in the Highlands planning area, as defined in section 3 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-3), to acquire development easements on farmland in the Highlands planning area using moneys from the Garden State Farmland Preservation Trust Fund, the committee shall accord a higher weight to any application submitted by a local government unit to preserve farmland in a municipality in the Highlands planning area that has amended its development regulations in accordance with section 13 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-13) to establish one or more receiving zones for the transfer of development potential from the Highlands preservation area, as defined in section 3 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-3), than that which is accorded to comparable applications submitted by other local government units to preserve farmland in municipalities in the Highlands planning area that have not made such amendments to their development regulations. m.   Notwithstanding any provision of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-1 et seq.) to the contrary, for State fiscal years 2005 through 2009, the sum spent by the committee in each of those fiscal years for the acquisition by the committee of development easements and fee simple titles to farmland for farmland preservation purposes using moneys from the Garden State Farmland Preservation Trust Fund in each county of the State shall be not less, and may be greater if additional sums become available, than the average annual sum spent by the department therefor in each such county, respectively, for State fiscal years 2002 through 2004, provided there is sufficient and appropriate farmland within the county to be so acquired by the committee for such purposes. (cf:  P.L.2023, c.245, s.1.) 3. This act shall take effect immediately.